Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.170

Committee meetings—Quorum—Effect of vacancy.

The committee shall meet at least once a year and at such times as may be necessary for the transaction of business.

A majority of the committee shall constitute a quorum.

A vacancy in the committee membership shall not impair the right of the remaining members of the committee to exercise any power or to perform any duty of the committee, so long as the power is exercised or the duty performed by a quorum of the committee.

[ 1989 c 202 s 9.]